District of Columbia statutes.
31-2502.29

Discriminations prohibited.

Discrimination between individual risks of the same class or hazard in the amount of premiums or rates charged for any policy, or in the benefits or amount of insurance payable thereon, or in any of the terms or conditions of such policy, or in any other manner whatsoever, is prohibited, and the Commissioner is empowered after investigation to order removed at such time and in such manner as he shall specify any such discrimination which his investigation may reveal.

Oct. 9, 1940, 54 Stat. 1077, ch. 792, ch. II, § 29
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(r)(2), 44 DCR 1730
1981 Ed., § 35-1533.
1973 Ed., § 35-1333.
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-2501.03.